District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Government Recruitment and Retention Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. (a)(1) For new employees hired after March 1, 2025, to eligible positions, the
Mayor shall provide a recruitment incentive of up to $5,000.
(2) For existing employees in eligible positions, the Mayor may provide a
retention payment of up to $5,000.


(b) Each quarter, the Mayor shall transmit to the Council a report on recruitment and
retention of difficult-to-fill positions. The report shall include, for the preceding quarter, for
eligible positions:
(1) Broken down by position type:
(A) The number of staff hired;
(B) The number of staff departing, including, where known, the reason for
the departure;
(C) The number and total dollar amount of recruitment incentives
provided; and
(D) The number and total dollar amount of retention payments provided;
and
(2) Total spend on recruitment incentives and retention payments, and remaining
available budget for recruitment incentives and retention payments.
(c) For the purposes of this section, “eligible positions” means:
(A) Correctional officers within the Department of Corrections;
(B) Call takers and call dispatchers within the Office of Unified
Communications;
(C) Staff within the Department of Behavioral Health Community
Response Team;
(D) Staff within the Child and Adolescent Mobile Psychiatric Service;
(E) Social workers, case managers, social services assistants, and social
services representatives within the Department of Human Services;
(F) Medical examiners within the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner;


(G) Direct care positions within the Department of Youth Rehabilitation
Services; and
(H) Positions identified by the Director of Recruitment and Retention
pursuant to section (b)(1) of this Act.
Sec. 3. (a) There is established, within the Office of the City Administrator, a Director of
Recruitment and Retention (“Director”).
(b) The Director shall:
(1) Identify mission-critical positions in District agencies that are difficult-to-fill
or have high attrition rates;
(2) Identify factors causing or contributing to these positions being difficult-to-fill
or suffering from high attrition, including issues of employee morale and enhanced mental health
support needs;
(3) On an annual basis, transmit a report to the Mayor and Council that includes
the following:
(A) A list of positions identified used paragraph (1) of this subsection,
including an explanation of data and standards used by the Director to identify these positions;
(B) A description of the factors, whether local or nationwide, causing or
contributing to these positions being difficult-to-fill or suffering from high attrition;
(C) Recommendations on incentives, interventions, and other changes to
agency law, policies, or practices to enhance recruitment and retention for those positions; and
(4) Work directly with agency leadership and staff to implement
recommendations proposed in the annual report required under paragraph (3) of this subsection,
or as otherwise necessary to address recruitment and retention issues within District agencies;


Sec. 4. For School Year 2025-2026 and subsequent school years:
(1) The Metropolitan Police Department (“MPD”) shall engage a District-based entity to
develop and execute a campaign to encourage District high school-age students to enroll in
MPD’s cadet corps program;
(2) The Department of Corrections (“DOC”) shall engage a District-based entity to
develop and execute a campaign to encourage District high school-age students to pursue a
career as DOC correctional officers; and
(3) The Office of Unified Communications (“OUC”) shall engage a District-based entity
to develop and execute a campaign to encourage District high school-age students to pursue a
career as OUC call takers and call dispatchers; and
(4) The Office of the Chief Medical Examiner (“OCME”) shall stand up an internship
program to encourage high school-age students to pursue a career with OCME.
Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
100 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
101 statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved October 16,
102 2006 (12 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
103 Sec. 6. Effective date.
104 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
105 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
106 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
107 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
108 Columbia Register.